Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-340
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Banking and Finance has power to make such rules and regulations for the government of all associations of the character defined in sections 8-301 to 8-340.01 as may, in its judgment, seem wise and expedient.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 20, p. 98;

R.S.1913, § 510;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 26, p. 734;

C.S.1922, § 8108;

C.S.1929, § 8-325;

R.S.1943, § 8-340;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 13.

For adoption and promulgation of administrative rules, see Administrative Procedure Act, section 84-920 et seq.